California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information that the board may require.

(d) Only the person making the written
 request shall be entitled to rely on the board’s written advice to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60210.5.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A tax liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of tax liability is
 attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the tax reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported tax liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in tax attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for tax (including
 interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of tax.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar months or quarters subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar month or quarter that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a),
 “reason to know” means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as a supplier entering, removing, or selling taxable diesel fuel, an interstate user, an exempt bus operator, or a highway vehicle operator using taxable diesel fuel to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as a supplier, interstate user, exempt bus operator, or highway vehicle operator, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any unpaid tax or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to the effective date of this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------

60211.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 60207, 60208, 60250, 60302, and 60339.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an area
 identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 112.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

60212.

(a) The board, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part where the failure to pay tax is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the board acting in his or her official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the taxpayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the board may require.

(d) The board may grant relief only for interest imposed on tax liabilities that arise during taxable periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [60250. - 60253.]

60250.

(a) Any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, as determined by the board pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the board, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the board.

(b) Any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month may elect to remit
 amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the board.

(c) Any person remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 60201). Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting period in the form and manner prescribed by the board. Any person
 who fails to timely file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of taxes with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) Any person required to remit taxes pursuant to this article who remits those taxes by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the taxes incorrectly remitted.

(f) Any person who fails to pay any tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 60301) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 60310), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the tax or amount of tax, in addition to the tax or amount of tax, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from
 the date on which the tax became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a person’s estimated tax liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the board may consider tax returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the board’s possession.

(h) The penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the taxes due for any one return. Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 60207.

(i) The board shall promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 23.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

60251.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with board procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 60250. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases
 his or her claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60252.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of tax. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person through
 his or her own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting his or her own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits his or her own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 60250 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the board. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60253.

(a) Any return, report, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the board may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return, declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed by the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the board shall be deemed
 to be a signed, valid original document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(d) Upon written approval of the board, a person may satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) by executing and providing to the board a consent and authorization for the Internal Revenue Service to provide to the board under Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code, the return filed by the person under Section 48.4101-2 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The board, in its sole discretion, may rescind its approval and require a person to file reports as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 68.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Determination If No Return Made [60301. - 60304.]

60301.

If any person fails, neglects, or refuses to file the return within the time prescribed by this chapter, the board shall estimate the diesel fuel removals, entries, sales, deliveries, or use for the period for which he or she made no return within the time required. Upon the basis of this estimate, the board shall determine the tax due from the person, and shall add to the tax a penalty of 10 percent thereof. The board may make a determination for more than one period and may make one or more determinations for the same period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60302.

Each determination so made, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the reporting period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60303.

If the neglect or refusal of a person to file a return is due to fraud or intent to evade the tax, a penalty of 25 percent of the tax shall be added thereto in addition to the 10-percent penalty provided in Section 60301.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60304.

Promptly after making its determination, the board shall give to the delinquent person written notice of the estimate, including tax, interest, and penalty. The notice shall be given in the manner prescribed in Section 60311 for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deficiency Determinations [60310. - 60317.]

60310.

If the board is not satisfied with the return made by any person, it may make a deficiency determination of the tax required to be paid by the person based upon information contained in the return or upon any information in the possession of the board. The board may make a determination for more than one period and may make one or more determinations for the same period. When a business is discontinued, a determination may be made at any time thereafter within the period specified in Section 60315, as to liability arising out of that business, irrespective of
 whether the determination is issued prior to the due date of the liability as otherwise specified in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60311.

The department shall give the person written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(a) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the person at that person’s address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in the United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.

(b) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served.
 Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of that delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(c) (1) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(A) The taxpayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(B) The department has evidence that the taxpayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(2) Service provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed
 complete at the time the department electronically transmits the notice via the taxpayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 119.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

60312.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60313.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to fraud or an intent to evade the tax, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60314.

All deficiency determinations, exclusive of penalty, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the calendar month following the reporting period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60315.

Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade this part or authorized rules and regulations, or failure to make a return, every notice of a deficiency determination shall be served to the person within three years after the last day of the calendar month following the reporting period for which the amount is proposed to be determined or within three years after the return is filed, whichever period expires later. In the case of a failure to make a return, the notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the date the return was due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 120.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

60316.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the tax or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 121.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

60317.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 60315 for serving a notice of deficiency determination the taxpayer has consented in writing to service of the notice after that time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 122.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Jeopardy Determinations and Weekly Payments [60330. - 60340.]

60330.

If the board believes that the collection of any amount of tax imposed under this part will be jeopardized by delay, it shall thereupon make a determination of the amount of tax, noting that fact upon the determination. The amount determined is immediately due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60331.

If the amount of the tax, interest, and penalty specified in the jeopardy determination is not paid within 10 days after service upon the person of notice of the determination, the determination becomes final, unless a petition for redetermination is filed within 10 days, and the delinquency penalty and interest provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 60350) shall attach to the amount specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60332.

The person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may petition for the redetermination thereof pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 60350). That person shall, however, file the petition for redetermination with the board within 10 days after the service upon that person of notice of the determination. At the time of filing the petition for redetermination, the person shall deposit with the board that security as the board may deem necessary to ensure compliance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60333.

(a) In accordance with rules and regulations as the board may prescribe, the person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may apply for an administrative hearing for one or more of the following purposes:

(1) To establish that the determination is excessive.

(2) To establish that the sale of property that may be seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination or any part thereof shall be delayed
 pending the administrative hearing because the sale would result in irreparable injury to the person.

(3) To request the release of all or a part of the property to the person.

(4) To request a stay of collection activities.

(b) The application shall be filed within 30 days after service of the notice of jeopardy determination and shall be in writing and state the specific factual and legal grounds upon which it is founded. No security need be posted to file the application and to obtain this hearing. However, if the person does not deposit within the 10-day period prescribed in Section 60332 that security as the board may deem necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the filing of the application shall not operate as a stay of collection activities, except sale of property seized after issuance of the jeopardy
 determination. Upon a showing of good cause for failure to file a timely application for administrative hearing, the board may allow a filing of the application and grant the person an administrative hearing. The filing of an application pursuant to this section shall not affect provisions of Section 60331 relating to the finality date of the determination or to penalty or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60334.

If the board deems it necessary in order to ensure payment to the state of the amount of taxes due from any supplier under this part, it may require the supplier to make returns and payments of taxes on a weekly basis. The supplier shall then file a return each Tuesday showing the total number of gallons of diesel fuel removed, entered or sold by him or her during the week ending the Saturday next preceding, the amount of tax due for that week, and any other information as the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this article. The return
 shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the board for the amount of tax due for the period covered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60335.

A supplier required to make weekly payments is not relieved of the duty of filing the verified monthly return required by Article 1 (commencing with Section 60201).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60336.

Whenever any supplier who is required to pay tax in weekly installments as provided by Section 60334 fails to make a weekly return or to pay the full amount in accordance with the terms and conditions prescribed by the board, the supplier’s license may be revoked forthwith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60337.

If a supplier fails to make a weekly return or to pay any weekly installment of the tax, or any part thereof, pursuant to the requirement imposed upon the supplier under Section 60334, the full amount of the installment becomes immediately due and payable. The board shall thereupon make a jeopardy determination under Section 60330 and the board shall forthwith collect the tax due from the supplier in the manner prescribed by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 60201) and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60401). All provisions of those chapters, where
 relevant, apply to collections required to be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60338.

If any supplier fails to pay any weekly installment of tax shown to be due by the supplier’s weekly return on the Tuesday when required to be paid, a penalty of 5 percent shall be added thereto. In addition, if any weekly installment of tax remains unpaid on the last day of the calendar month following the month during which the last of the removals, entries, or sales occurred on which the weekly installment was levied, a penalty of 10 percent of the installment, exclusive of penalties, shall be added thereto.

The
 weekly installment shall be deemed not paid or unpaid on any particular day:

(a) If not paid prior to 5 p.m. of that day, when paid in person.

(b) If the envelope in which the remittance is enclosed bears a post office cancellation mark dated later than that day, when paid by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60339.

All jeopardy determinations including those made under Section 60337, exclusive of penalty, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the reporting period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60340.

Any notice required by this article may be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 123.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Redeterminations [60350. - 60356.]

60350.

Any person against whom a determination is made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 60301) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 60310) may petition for a redetermination within 30 days after the date the notice thereof is given to him or her. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the determination becomes final at the expiration of the period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60351.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60352.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the determination and, if the person has so requested in his or her petition, shall grant him or her an oral hearing and shall give 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. Service of notice shall be as prescribed by Section 60173. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60353.

The board may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the board at or before the hearing. Unless the penalty imposed by Section 60303, 60313, or 60361 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase must be asserted within eight years after the date the return for the period for which the increase is asserted was due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60354.

The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after the giving of notice thereof to the person as prescribed by Section 60173.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60355.

All determinations made by the board under this chapter are due and payable at the time they become final. If they are not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination, exclusive of interest and penalties, shall be added thereto. Payment shall be made in the form of a remittance payable to the board and shall be filed with the board together with a copy of the notice of determination which the board shall furnish to the person for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60356.

In making a determination, the board may offset overpayments for a period or periods, together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments. The interest on the underpayments and overpayments shall be computed in the manner set forth in Sections 60314 and 60524.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Payment by Unlicensed Persons [60360. - 60366.]

60360.

If any person becomes a supplier, exempt bus operator, government entity, qualified highway vehicle operator, or interstate user without first securing a license, the tax, and applicable penalties and interest, if any, become immediately due and payable on account of all diesel fuel removed, entered, sold, delivered, or used by him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 69.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60361.

(a) The board shall forthwith ascertain as best it may the amount of the diesel fuel removed, entered, sold, delivered, or used and shall determine immediately the tax on that amount, adding to the tax a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of tax or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater, and shall give the unlicensed person notice of this determination as prescribed by Section 60340. However, where the board determines that the failure to secure a license was due to reasonable cause, the penalty may be waived. Sections 60331
 and 60332 shall be applicable with respect to the finality of the determination and the right of the unlicensed person to petition for a redetermination.

Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases the claim for relief.

(b) In any case where the board does not determine an amount of tax due, the unlicensed person shall be subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100), which penalty shall be immediately due and payable. Each subsequent violation shall increase the penalty amount by one hundred dollars ($100), up to a maximum penalty of five hundred dollars ($500). The board shall serve the person with a notice of penalty assessment in the manner prescribed by Section 60340 for service of notice of a deficiency determination. However, if the board finds that the failure of the
 person to secure a license was due to reasonable cause, the board may waive the penalty. A person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the request for relief is based.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

60361.5.

(a) Except in the case of a qualified highway vehicle operator, the backup tax imposed under Section 60058 and any applicable penalties and interest shall be immediately due and payable. The board shall forthwith ascertain as best it may the amount of diesel fuel sold, or delivered into the fuel tank of a diesel fuel-powered highway vehicle, or sold and delivered into the fuel tank of a diesel fuel-powered highway vehicle, and shall determine immediately the tax on the amount and shall give the highway vehicle operator/fueler notice
 of this determination as prescribed by Section 60340. The determination shall include interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the date the backup tax applies until the date of remittance to the state. The provisions of Sections 60331 and 60332 shall be applicable with respect to the finality of the determination and the right of the highway vehicle operator/fueler to petition for a redetermination.

(b) A penalty of 25 percent of the amount of tax or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater, shall be added to the tax.

(c) If more than one of the penalties specified in this section and Section 60105, 60106.3, or 60503.2 is otherwise applicable, only the penalty totaling the greatest amount shall be imposed, and the penalty specified in this section may be imposed
 only if the amount of penalty exceeds any other applicable penalty.

(d) Where the board determines that the sale, delivery into the fuel tank of a diesel fuel-powered highway vehicle, or sale and delivery into the fuel tank of a diesel fuel-powered highway vehicle of untaxed diesel fuel was due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty. A person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the request for relief is based.

(e) All administrative provisions contained in this part that apply to a supplier shall also be applicable to a highway vehicle operator/fueler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 292.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

60362.

The board shall forthwith collect the tax, penalty, and interest due from the unlicensed person by seizure and sale of property in the manner prescribed for the collection of a delinquent monthly tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60363.

At the request of the board, the Attorney General shall commence and prosecute to final determination an action at law to collect the tax, penalty, and interest, or any part thereof, determined against an unlicensed person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60364.
